Utah statutes.
4-8-7.   Defense to claim of illegal activity.

No person who acts in compliance with any rule adopted under authority of this chapter shall be considered to be engaged in any illegal conspiracy or combination in restraint of trade or to be acting in furtherance of any illegal purpose.



Amended by Chapter 179, 2007 General Session

